test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_naver_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - naver: # MLO, ok
    naver+N+Sg+Nom: naṿer
    naver+N+Sg+Gen: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Acc: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Ill: naharân
    naver+N+Sg+Loc: naharist
    naver+N+Sg+Com: naharáin
    naver+N+Sg+Abe: nahhaarttáá
    naver+N+Ess: naṿerin
    naver+N+Par: naṿerid
    naver+N+Pl+Nom: nahareh
    naver+N+Pl+Gen: naharij
    naver+N+Pl+Acc: naharijd
    naver+N+Pl+Ill: naharáid
    naver+N+Pl+Loc: naharijn
    naver+N+Pl+Com: naharijguin
    naver+N+Pl+Abe: naharijttáá

  Noun - käävir: # 2A v-k, v->h, VV > V
    käävir+N+Sg+Nom: kääṿir
    käävir+N+Sg+Gen: käähir
    käävir+N+Sg+Acc: käähir
    käävir+N+Sg+Ill: kähirân
    käävir+N+Sg+Loc: kähirist
    käävir+N+Sg+Com: kähiráin
    käävir+N+Sg+Abe: käähirttáá
    käävir+N+Ess: käṿirin
    käävir+N+Par: käṿirid
    käävir+N+Pl+Nom: kähireh
    käävir+N+Pl+Gen: kähirij
    käävir+N+Pl+Acc: kähirijd
    käävir+N+Pl+Ill: kähiráid
    käävir+N+Pl+Loc: kähirijn
    käävir+N+Pl+Com: kähirijguin
    käävir+N+Pl+Abe: kähirijttáá


  Noun - sajos: # MLO, ok
    sajos+N+Sg+Nom: saˊjos
    sajos+N+Sg+Gen: saijoos
    sajos+N+Sg+Acc: saijoos
    sajos+N+Sg+Ill: saˊj̣osân
    sajos+N+Sg+Loc: saˊj̣osist
    sajos+N+Sg+Com: saˊj̣osáin
    sajos+N+Sg+Abe: saijoosttáá
    sajos+N+Ess: saˊj̣osin
    sajos+N+Par: saˊj̣osid
    sajos+N+Pl+Nom: saˊj̣oseh
    sajos+N+Pl+Gen: saˊj̣osij
    sajos+N+Pl+Acc: saˊj̣̣osijd
    sajos+N+Pl+Ill: saˊj̣osáid
    sajos+N+Pl+Loc: saˊj̣osijn
    sajos+N+Pl+Com: saˊj̣osijguin
    sajos+N+Pl+Abe: saˊj̣osijttáá


  Noun - čavos: # MLO, ok; this is an adjective
    čavos+N+Sg+Nom: čavos
    čavos+N+Sg+Gen: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Acc: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Ill: čaposân
    čavos+N+Sg+Loc: čaposist
    čavos+N+Sg+Com: čaposáin
    čavos+N+Sg+Abe: čappoosttáá
    čavos+N+Ess: [čavosin, čaposin]
    čavos+N+Par: [čavosid, čaposid]
    čavos+N+Pl+Nom: čaposeh
    čavos+N+Pl+Gen: čaposij
    čavos+N+Pl+Acc: čaposijd
    čavos+N+Pl+Ill: čaposáid
    čavos+N+Pl+Loc: čaposijn
    čavos+N+Pl+Com: čaposijguin
    čavos+N+Pl+Abe: čaposijttáá


  Noun - kielâs: # 2A
    kielâs+N+Sg+Nom: kielâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Gen: kiellâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Acc: kiellâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Ill: kieˊḷâsân
    kielâs+N+Sg+Loc: kieˊḷâsist
    kielâs+N+Sg+Com: kieˊḷâsáin
    kielâs+N+Sg+Abe: kiellâsttáá
    kielâs+N+Ess: kieˊḷâsin
    kielâs+N+Par: kieˊḷâsid
    kielâs+N+Pl+Nom: kieˊḷâseh
    kielâs+N+Pl+Gen: kieˊḷâsij
    kielâs+N+Pl+Acc: kieˊḷâsijd
    kielâs+N+Pl+Ill: kieˊḷâsáid
    kielâs+N+Pl+Loc: kieˊḷâsijn
    kielâs+N+Pl+Com: kieˊḷâsijguin   
    kielâs+N+Pl+Abe: kieˊḷâsijttáá   


  Noun - almos: # MLO, ok; this is an adjective
    almos+N+Sg+Nom: aˊlmos             
    almos+N+Sg+Gen: almoos
    almos+N+Sg+Acc: almoos
    almos+N+Sg+Ill: aˊlmosân
    almos+N+Sg+Loc: aˊlmosist
    almos+N+Sg+Com: aˊlmosáin
    almos+N+Sg+Abe: almoosttáá
    almos+N+Ess: aˊlmosin                
    almos+N+Par: aˊlmosid                
    almos+N+Pl+Nom: aˊlmoseh
    almos+N+Pl+Gen: aˊlmosij
    almos+N+Pl+Acc: aˊlmosijd
    almos+N+Pl+Ill: aˊlmosáid
    almos+N+Pl+Loc: aˊlmosijn
    almos+N+Pl+Com: aˊlmosijguin
    almos+N+Pl+Abe: aˊlmosijttáá


  Noun - kieles: # MLO, ok; subst + adj
    kieles+N+Sg+Nom: kieles
    kieles+N+Sg+Gen: kiällás
    kieles+N+Sg+Acc: kiällás
    kieles+N+Sg+Ill: kiäˊḷásân
    kieles+N+Sg+Loc: kiäˊḷásist
    kieles+N+Sg+Com: kiäˊḷásáin
    kieles+N+Sg+Abe: kiällásttáá
    kieles+N+Ess:    kielesin
    kieles+N+Par:    kielesid
    kieles+N+Pl+Nom: kiäˊḷáseh
    kieles+N+Pl+Gen: kiäˊḷásij
    kieles+N+Pl+Acc: kiäˊḷásijd
    kieles+N+Pl+Ill: kiäˊḷásáid
    kieles+N+Pl+Loc: kiäˊḷásijn
    kieles+N+Pl+Com: kiäˊḷásijguin
    kieles+N+Pl+Abe: kiäˊḷásijttáá


  Noun - kiärun: # 2B
    kiärun+N+Sg+Nom: kiärun 
    kiärun+N+Sg+Gen: kiärrun
    kiärun+N+Sg+Acc: kiärrun
    kiärun+N+Sg+Ill: kiäˊṛunân
    kiärun+N+Sg+Loc: kiäˊṛunist
    kiärun+N+Sg+Com: kiäˊṛunáin
    kiärun+N+Sg+Abe: kiärrunttáá
    kiärun+N+Ess: kiäˊṛunin
    kiärun+N+Par: kiäˊṛunid
    kiärun+N+Pl+Nom: kiäˊṛuneh
    kiärun+N+Pl+Gen: kiäˊṛunij
    kiärun+N+Pl+Acc: kiäˊṛunijd
    kiärun+N+Pl+Ill: kiäˊṛunáid
    kiärun+N+Pl+Loc: kiäˊṛunijn
    kiärun+N+Pl+Com: kiäˊṛunijguin
    kiärun+N+Pl+Abe: kiäˊṛunijttáá
